Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 7
RECREATION DISTRICTS - COUNTY

30-20-701. Legislative declaration.

It is declared that the creation of recreation districts, having the purposes and powers provided in this part 7, will serve a public use and will promote the health, safety, prosperity, security, and general welfare of the inhabitants of said districts.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 698, § 1.

CSA:

C. 136, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 114-2-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 114-2-1.

30-20-702. County may establish districts.

Whenever a county has acquired property for recreational purposes, as authorized in sections 29-7-101 to 29-7-104, C.R.S., such county may establish a recreation district. This district shall be composed of the unincorporated area benefited by the establishment of the proposed recreational facility, the boundaries to be designated by the board of county commissioners. If a county planning commission has been created in the county under the authority of part 1 of article 28 of this title, it is the duty of such planning commission, upon request from the board of county commissioners, to formulate a tentative plan for the formation of such recreation district. The plan shall include recommendations as to the area to be benefited and boundaries and powers of the district. Upon completion of the plan, the county planning commission shall certify such plan to the board of county commissioners.

Before the creation of a recreation district, a hearing thereon shall be held by the board of county commissioners to ascertain the sentiment of residents of the area toward the establishment of such a district. Notice of the hearing, stating the time, place, date, and purpose of the hearing, and including a description of the proposed boundaries, shall be published once weekly for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper published and of general circulation in the county.

After the hearing, the board of county commissioners, at any regularly scheduled meeting, may change, amend, reject, or adopt the plan formulated and certified by the county planning commission and by resolution create a recreation district.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 698, § 2.

CSA:

C. 136, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 114-2-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 114-2-2.

30-20-702.5. Acquisition of land by Larimer county authorized.

The general assembly finds and declares that it is in the best interests of the state for Larimer county to acquire certain properties in the floodplain areas of the Big Thompson canyon and the north fork thereof. In making such acquisitions, Larimer county shall be subject to the findings of the Colorado water conservation board with respect to the location of said floodplain areas. The county shall establish a recreation district pursuant to the provisions of this article for the purpose of making the acquisitions authorized and for the further purposes of the future management, control, and financing of all park and recreational areas developed following such acquisitions. In acquiring lands as authorized, the county and the recreation district shall seek primarily lands near inhabited areas which are unlikely to be the subject of direct acquisition by the federal forest service or other federal agency.

The division of parks and wildlife, as a part of its duties under section 33-10-108, C.R.S., shall undertake the duties of coordinating federal, state, and local efforts and contributions, in the development of the land acquired pursuant to this section, in order that the people of the state shall receive benefits from the park and recreational facilities thus acquired.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1451, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 85:

(2) amended, p. 1363, § 29, effective June 28.

30-20-703. Powers of county commissioners.

Acting on behalf of such district, the board of county commissioners may:

Levy a tax on all real and personal property situated within the district not to exceed one mill, the proceeds of which shall be used within the district for operation, maintenance, capital improvements, acquisition of additional property, and employment of a staff to supervise a program of activities, and receive gifts of money or property for construction and operation of recreational facilities and programs; but if the recreational district comprises the entire county, the board of county commissioners is authorized to appropriate from the general fund for this purpose and no special levy is authorized;

Establish a board of five residents of the district who own real estate within the district and who have paid a tax thereon for at least one year preceding their selection, to administer the facility, and to supervise the conduct of the recreational programs. Each member of the board, upon approval by a majority of the taxpaying electors residing in the district voting on the question at a general election, may receive as compensation for his services a sum not in excess of six hundred dollars per annum, payable not to exceed twenty-five dollars per meeting attended. Terms of such board members shall be so arranged that the term of one member expires each year. The manner of selection and the powers shall be determined by the board of county commissioners in its order creating the recreation district.

Provide for the employment of personnel to operate and manage the facilities and recreation programs, and cooperate with other public and private agencies in the operation and management of the facilities and program;

Provide for the creation of a reserve fund adequate to meet the obligations of the district, for maintenance and operating charges and depreciation, and to provide replacements of and betterments to the improvements of the district.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 699, § 3.

CSA:

C. 136, § 7.

L. 53:

p. 220, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 114-2-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 114-2-3.

L. 67:

p. 714, § 4.

Cross references:

For procedure to increase tax levy beyond statutory limits, see § 29-1-302.

30-20-704. Budget.

The operations of the recreation district shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of the local government budget law. The proposed budget shall be submitted to the board of county commissioners by the district board on or before the same date that is set for other departments of county government. In no event shall the provisions of this section be construed to prevent the creation of a reserve fund as provided in section 30-20-703.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 699, § 4.

CSA:

C. 136, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 114-2-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 114-2-4.

30-20-705. Purpose.

No part of this part 7 shall repeal or affect any other act or any part thereof, it being intended that this part 7 shall provide a separate method of accomplishing its objects, and not an exclusive one.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 700, § 5.

CSA:

C. 136, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 114-2-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 114-2-5.